lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/b.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl %>


LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
bob m ;
boat m ;
cat m ;
bus m ;
tax m ;
jazz m ;
fuzz m ;
match m ;
fish m ;
class m ;
chassis m ;
ox OX ;
spy m ;
boy m ;

LEXICON m
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>s # ;

LEXICON OX
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:%>en # ;
